cs: Materiál svíčky: Včelí vosk; Parafínový vosk; Sojový vosk; Jiné
sl-SI: Material sveče: Čebelji vosek; Parafinski vosek; Sojin vosek; Drugo
zh-TW: 蠟燭材質: 蜂蠟; 石蠟; 大豆蠟; 其他
zh-CN: 蜡烛材质: 蜂蜡; 石蜡; 大豆蜡; 其他
vi: Vật liệu nến: Sáp ong; Sáp paraffin; Sáp đậu nành; Khác
hr-HR: Materijal svijeće: Pčelinji vosak; Parafinski vosak; Sojin vosak; Ostalo
ko: 캔들 소재: 밀랍; 파라핀 왁스; 소이왁스; 기타
bg-BG: Материал на свещ: Пчелен восък; Парафинов восък; Соев восък; Други
nb: Lysmateriale: Bivoks; Parafinvoks; Soyavoks; Annet
pt-BR: Material da vela: Cera de abelha; Cera de parafina; Cera de soja; Outro
en: Candle material: Beeswax; Paraffin wax; Soy wax; Other
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำเทียน: ขี้ผึ้ง; ไขพาราฟิน; ไขถั่วเหลือง; อื่นๆ
de: Kerzenmaterial: Bienenwachs; Paraffinwachs; Sojawachs; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Material lumânare: Ceară de albine; Ceară de parafină; Ceară de soia; Altele
lt-LT: Žvakės medžiaga: Bičių vaškas; Parafino vaškas; Sojų vaškas; Kita
ru: Материал свечи: Пчелиный воск; Парафин; Соевый воск; Другое
fr: Matériau de la bougie: Cire d’abeille; Cire de paraffine; Cire de soja; Autre
ja: キャンドル材質: 蜜蝋; パラフィンワックス; ソイワックス; その他
sk-SK: Materiál sviečky: Včelí vosk; Parafínový vosk; Sójový vosk; Iné
nl: Type kaarsmateriaal: Bijenwas; Paraffinewas; Sojawas; Andere
hu: Gyertya anyaga: Méhviasz; Paraffinviasz; Szójaviasz; Egyéb
el: Υλικό κεριού: Κερί μέλισσας; Κερί παραφίνης; Κερί σόγιας; Άλλο
sv: Ljus - material: Bivax; Paraffinvax; Sojavax; Övrigt
da: Stearinlysmateriale: Bivoks; Paraffinvoks; Sojavoks; Andet
es: Material de la vela: Cera de abejas; Cera de parafina; Cera de soja; Otros
pt-PT: Material da vela: Cera de abelha; Cera de parafina; Cera de soja; Outro
it: Materiale della candela: Cera d'api; Cera di paraffina; Cera di soia; Altro
fi: Kynttilän materiaali: Mehiläisvaha; Parafiinivaha; Soijavaha; Muu
pl: Materiał świecy: Wosk pszczeli; Parafina; Wosk sojowy; Inne
tr: Mum malzemesi: Balmumu; Parafin mumu; Soya balmumu; Diğer